New York, session 2025-2026, A2656.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 2 99-ss to read as follows: 3 § 99-ss. Bridge suicide barrier fund. 1. There is hereby established 4 in the joint custody of the state comptroller and the commissioner of 5 taxation and finance a bridge suicide barrier fund which shall consist 6 of all monies appropriated to such fund. 7 2. Monies in the bridge suicide barrier fund shall be utilized for 8 studying any project involving the construction of a new bridge or the 9 replacement of a bridge with a history of suicide attempts and how to 10 include in the new or replacement bridge a suicide barrier. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02702-01-5